src/fst/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON derivational_focus_case
 end_noun_cases ;
+Der/Foc:%>nguninji		end_noun_cases;		! focus (sometimes annotated as SPEC)

LEXICON derivational_case_3
+Der/Hav:%>kurlu		end_noun_cases ;
+Der/Thing:%>pinti		end_noun_cases ;
+Der/Priv:%>parni		end_noun_cases ;
+Der/Int:%>kija			end_noun_cases ;
+Der/Want:%>jiraja		end_noun_cases ;
+Der/Asst:%>jarra		end_noun_cases ;
+Der/Temp:%>puru		end_noun_cases ;
+Der/Dwell:%>karraja		end_noun_cases ;
+Der/Side:%>karti		end_noun_cases ;
+Der/Type:%>partu		end_noun_cases ;
+Der/Sim:%>yuru			end_noun_cases ;
+Der/Contr:%>munu		end_noun_cases ;
+Der/Mod:%>marta		end_noun_cases ;
+Der/Big:%>paka			end_noun_cases ;
+Der/Anoth:%>kujupa		end_noun_cases ;
+Der/Very:%>minyirri		end_noun_cases ;
+Der/Num:%>marlu		end_noun_cases ;
+Der/Dual:%>kujarra		end_noun_cases ;
+Der/Few:%>paraku		end_noun_cases ;
+Der/Pl:%>n			end_noun_cases ;
+Der/Pl:%>rti			end_noun_cases ;
+Der/Grp:%>ngurun		end_noun_cases ;
+Der/Pair:%>rarra		end_noun_cases ;
+Der/Only:%>wiyaju		end_noun_cases ;
+Der/Foc:%>nguninji		end_noun_cases ;

LEXICON semantic_case_3
@D.SCASE.ABL@+Abl:@D.SCASE.ABL@%>janu		end_noun_cases ;
@D.SCASE.ABL@+Abl:@D.SCASE.ABL@%>nguru		end_noun_cases ;
@D.SCASE.GEN@+Gen:@D.SCASE.GEN@%>kurnu		end_noun_cases ;
! @D.SCASE.GEN@+Gen:@D.SCASE.GEN@%>kura		end_noun_cases ;
! @D.SCASE.GEN@+Gen:@D.SCASE.GEN@%>kurangu	end_noun_cases ;
@D.SCASE.LOC@+Loc:@D.SCASE.LOC@%>ngka		end_noun_cases ;
! @D.SCASE.LOC@+Loc:@D.SCASE.LOC@%>ja		end_noun_cases ;
! @D.SCASE.LOC@+Loc:@D.SCASE.LOC@%>ta		end_noun_cases ;
@D.SCASE.PERL@+Perl:@D.SCASE.PERL@%>wana	end_noun_cases ;
@D.SCASE.ALL@+All:@D.SCASE.ALL@%>kutu		end_noun_cases ;

LEXICON grammatical_case_3
	end_noun_cases ;
+Abs: 	end_noun_cases ;
+Erg:%>lu end_noun_cases ;
!+Erg:%>tu end_noun_cases ;
!+Erg:%>ju end_noun_cases ;
+Dat:%>ku end_noun_cases ;

LEXICON end_noun_cases
 PA ;
 K_1 ; ! no person-number suffixed


!! temporal and spatial nouns - have a limited set of specific case endings, and do not have pronoun
!! clitics
LEXICON n_temporal_agr
+N+Sem/Temp:%> temporal_case ;

LEXICON n_spatial_agr
+N+Sem/Spat: spatial_case ;

LEXICON temporal_case
		# ;
+Der/TempLoc:%>ngka	# ;
+Der/Asst:%>jarra	# ;
+Der/Anoth:%>kujupa	# ;

LEXICON spatial_case
			# ;
+Der/Anoth:%>kujupa	# ;
+Der/Side:%>karti	# ;
+Der/SpatAbl:%>mpanguru	# ;
+Der/SpatAll:%>warraku	# ;


!! demonstrative lexicons
LEXICON yangka_inflection
+Dem/ngula:%>ngula K_1 ; ! PA ;
+Dem/pa:%>pa K_1 ; ! PA ;
 K_1 ;

LEXICON palunya_inflection
 demonstrative_cases ;
+Loc:%>ngka sentence_modifier ;
+Abl:%>janu sentence_modifier ;
+Dem/janulu:%>janulu sentence_modifier ;

LEXICON jii_inflection
 demonstrative_cases ;
+Dem/na:%>na sentence_modifier ;
+Dem/janu:%>janu sentence_modifier ;

LEXICON sentence_modifier
+SentMod:	K_1 ; ! PA ;

LEXICON demonstrative_cases
 derivational_case_demonst ;
 semantic_case_demonst ;

LEXICON derivational_case_demonst
 grammatical_case_demonst_1 ;
+Der/Hav:%>kurlu	grammatical_case_demonst_1 ;
+Der/Thing:%>pinti	grammatical_case_demonst_1 ;
+Der/Priv:%>parni	grammatical_case_demonst_1 ;
+Der/Int:%>kija		grammatical_case_demonst_1 ;
+Der/Want:%>jiraja	grammatical_case_demonst_1 ;
+Der/Asst:%>jarra	grammatical_case_demonst_1 ;
+Der/Temp:%>puru	grammatical_case_demonst_1 ;
+Der/Dwell:%>karraja	grammatical_case_demonst_1 ;
+Der/Side:%>karti	grammatical_case_demonst_1 ;
+Der/Type:%>partu	grammatical_case_demonst_1 ;
+Der/Sim:%>yuru		grammatical_case_demonst_1 ;
+Der/Contr:%>munu	grammatical_case_demonst_1 ;
+Der/Mod:%>marta	grammatical_case_demonst_1 ;
+Der/Big:%>paka		grammatical_case_demonst_1 ;
+Der/Anoth:%>kujupa	grammatical_case_demonst_1 ;
+Der/Very:%>minyirri	grammatical_case_demonst_1 ;
+Der/Num:%>marlu	grammatical_case_demonst_1 ;
+Der/Dual:%>kujarra	grammatical_case_demonst_1 ;
+Der/Few:%>paraku	grammatical_case_demonst_1 ;
+Der/Pl:%>n		grammatical_case_demonst_1 ;
+Der/Pl:%>rti		grammatical_case_demonst_1 ;
+Der/Grp:%>ngurun	grammatical_case_demonst_1 ;
+Der/Pair:%>rarra	grammatical_case_demonst_1 ;
+Der/Only:%>wiyaju	grammatical_case_demonst_1 ;
+Der/Foc:%>nguninji	grammatical_case_demonst_1 ;

LEXICON grammatical_case_demonst_1
 end_noun_cases ;
+Abs: 		end_noun_cases ;
+Erg:%>lu 	end_noun_cases ;
!+Erg:%>tu 	end_noun_cases ;
!+Erg:%>ju	end_noun_cases ;
+Dat:%>ku 	end_noun_cases ;

LEXICON semantic_case_demonst
+Abl:%>janu		grammatical_case_demonst_2 ;
+Abl:%>nguru		grammatical_case_demonst_2 ;
+Gen:%>kurnu		grammatical_case_demonst_2 ;
! +Gen:%>kura		grammatical_case_demonst_2 ;
! +Gen:%>kurangu	grammatical_case_demonst_2 ;
+Loc:%>ngka		grammatical_case_demonst_2 ;
! +Loc:%>ja		grammatical_case_demonst_2 ;
! +Loc:%>ta		grammatical_case_demonst_2 ;
+Perl:%>wana		grammatical_case_demonst_2 ;
+All:%>kutu		grammatical_case_demonst_2 ;

LEXICON grammatical_case_demonst_2
 end_noun_cases ;
+Abs: 		end_noun_cases ;
+Erg:%>lu 	end_noun_cases ;
!+Erg:%>tu 	end_noun_cases ;
!+Erg:%>ju	end_noun_cases ;
+Dat:%>ku 	end_noun_cases ;
 
