src/fst/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON Nouns	! can reduplicate before cases are added. Includes both nouns and adjective (descriptive)
munga n_temporal_agr "night" ;
yunguny n_temporal_agr "morning, tomorrow" ;
ruka n_temporal_agr "sunset" ;
raka n_temporal_agr "sunrise" ;
rakarra n_temporal_agr "sunrise" ;
kanangka n_temporal_agr "sunrise" ;
karrpu n_temporal_agr "day" ;
kayili n_spatial_agr "north" ;
kakarra n_spatial_agr "east" ;
wilura n_spatial_agr "west" ;
yulparrira n_spatial_agr "south" ;
yulparri n_spatial_agr "south" ; ! alternate form of yulparrira?
kankani n_spatial_agr "above, on top of" ;
kani n_spatial_agr "above, top" ; ! alternate form of kankani?
kanin n_spatial_agr "below" ;
